North Dakota, session 69, SB2001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from the insurance regulatory trust fund, not
otherwise appropriated, to the legislative branch of state government for the purpose of defraying the
expenses of the legislative branch of state government, for the fiscal period beginning with the effective
date of this Act, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Subdivision 1.
SIXTY-NINTH AND SEVENTIETH LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLIES AND BIENNIUM
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $12,950,567 $1,645,103 $14,595,670
Operating expenses 4,772,209 5,398,631 10,170,840
Capital assets 6,000 220,000 226,000
National conference of state legislatures 283,070 23,102 306,172
Total general fund $18,011,846 $7,286,836 $25,298,682
Subdivision 2.
LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT AND LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $15,435,797 $1,190,358 $16,626,155
New and vacant FTE pool 0 5,088,515 5,088,515
Operating expenses 3,780,912 1,435,238 5,216,150
Public printing 0 290,000 290,000
Capital assets 6,000 280,000 286,000
Total all funds $19,222,709 $8,284,111 $27,506,820
Less other funds 88,000 0 88,000
Total general fund $19,134,709 $8,284,111 $27,418,820
Full-time equivalent positions 45.00 25.00 70.00
Subdivision 3.
TOTAL - SECTION 1
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Grand total all funds $37,234,555 $15,570,947 $52,805,502

S. B. NO. 2001 - PAGE 2
Less grand total other funds 88,000 0 88,000
Grand total general fund $37,146,555 $15,570,947 $52,717,502
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in each entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which each entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth
legislative assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One - Time Funding Description General Fund Other Funds Total Funds
Legislative Assembly
Legislative chambers and $4,451,000 $0 $4,451,000
system upgrades
Total legislative assembly $4,451,000 $0 $4,451,000
Legislative Management
and Legislative Council
Costs related to new positions $375,000 $0 $375,000
Legislative term limit study 225,000 0 225,000
Information technology equipment 280,000 0 280,000
Total legislative management and
legislative council $880,000 $0 $880,000
Grand total $5,331,000 $0 $5,331,000
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - BUDGET SECTION REPORT.
1. The legislative council may not spend funds from the new and vacant FTE pool line item in
subdivision 2 of section 1 of this Act, but may transfer funds from this line item to the salaries
and wages line item as necessary to provide funding for:
a. Filling a new FTE position from the date of hire through the end of the biennium; or
b. Salaries and wages if actual salaries and wages savings from vacant positions and
employee turnover adjusted for other uses are less than the estimate used by the sixty-
ninth legislative assembly in the development of the appropriation.
2. The legislative council shall report to the budget section regarding the use of funding in the
pool including information on:
a. New FTE positions, including the date hired;
b. Vacant FTE positions, including information on positions that become vacant and
positions filled, salaries and wages savings resulting from vacant positions and employee
turnover, and the use of salaries and wages savings for other purposes; and
c. Additional salaries and wages funding needed due to savings from vacant positions
being less than anticipated.
3. If funding in the new and vacant FTE pool line item is insufficient to provide the necessary
salaries and wages funding for the biennium, the legislative council may request a deficiency
appropriation from the seventieth legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. EXEMPTION - TRANSFERS. Notwithstanding section 54-16-04, the director of the
office of management and budget shall transfer appropriation authority between line items of the
legislative management and legislative council as may be requested by the chairman of the legislative
management or the director of the legislative council upon the finding by the chairman or the director
that the nature of studies and duties assigned to the legislative management or legislative council
requires the transfers in properly carrying on the legislative management's and legislative council's
functions and duties. The director of the office of management and budget shall similarly make transfers

S. B. NO. 2001 - PAGE 3
of appropriation authority between the line items for the sixty-ninth and seventieth legislative
assemblies, upon request by the chairman of the legislative management or the director of the
legislative council upon the finding by the chairman or director that the transfers are required for the
legislative assembly to carry on its functions and duties.
SECTION 5. APPLICATION, TRANSFER AUTHORITY, AND CANCELLATION OF
UNEXPENDED APPROPRIATIONS. Sections 54-16-04 and 54-44.1-11 do not apply to chapter 1 of the
2023 Session Laws. The director of the office of management and budget shall make transfers of
appropriation authority between the line items and the agencies of the legislative branch within
section 1 of that chapter as requested by the chairman of the legislative management or the director of
the legislative council. The office of management and budget shall cancel unexpended appropriations
for the legislative assembly and legislative council enacted prior to the 2023-25 biennium as directed by
the chairman of the legislative management or the director of the legislative council.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 48-08-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
48-08-04. Use of legislative assembly rooms, and halls, and other space in the capitol.
During the interim between legislative sessions, the committee rooms, halls, passageways, and
other space in the capitol used by the legislative assembly, including the pioneer room, the coteau
room, the Sheyenne River room, judicial wing room 216, and judicial wing rooms 327 B, C, and E, may
not be used without authorization of the legislative council. The fifteenth floor of the capitol is reserved
for the exclusive use of the legislative council.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Section 54-03-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-03-10. Compensation of speaker, majority and minority leaders, assistant majority and
minority leaders, committee chairmen, and employees.
The speaker of the house, the house majority leader, the senate majority leader, the house minority
leader, and the senate minority leader shall each receive as compensation, in addition to any other
compensation or expense reimbursement provided by law, the sum of fifteentwenty dollars per day for
each calendar day during any regular, special, or organizational session. Chairmen of the substantive
standing committees, the house assistant majority leader, the senate assistant majority leader, the
house assistant minority leader, and the senate assistant minority leader shall receive additional
compensation of tenfifteen dollars for each calendar day during any regular, special, or organizational
session. The additional compensation provided by this section must be paid in the manner provided in
section 54-03-20. The legislative assembly, by concurrent resolution, shall fix the compensation of the
other officers and employees elected or appointed.
SECTION 8. AMENDMENT. Section 54-03-20 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-03-20. Compensation and expense reimbursement of members of the legislative
assembly.
1. Each member of the legislative assembly is entitled to receive as compensation for services
the sum of two hundred fivetwo hundred nineteen dollars through June 30, 20242026, and two
hundred thirteen two hundred twenty - six dollars thereafter for each calendar day during any
organizational, special, or regular legislative session and for each day that member attends a
meeting of a legislative committee between the organizational session and the regular session
as authorized by legislative rule.
2. a. Each member of the legislative assembly is entitled to receive reimbursement for lodging,
which may not exceed per calendar month the amount established under this subdivision
by the director of the office of management and budget for lodging in state and which

S. B. NO. 2001 - PAGE 4
may not exceed the rate provided in section 44-08-04 for each calendar day during the
period of any organizational, special, or regular session. On August first of each
even-numbered year, the director of the office of management and budget shall set the
maximum monthly reimbursement for the subsequent two-year period at an amount
equal to thirty times seventy percent of the daily lodging reimbursement in effect on that
date as provided under subdivision d of subsection 2 of section 44-08-04.
b. Notwithstanding subdivision a:
(1) A member of the legislative assembly may elect to be reimbursed for less than the
amount to which the legislator is entitled under this subsection by claiming the
lesser amount on a voucher submitted with the receipt required by section
44-08-04.
(2) The legislative management may establish guidelines that may result in a reduced
maximum reimbursement for a single dwelling in which two or more legislators
share lodging and the total rent for that dwelling exceeds the amount to which a
legislator is entitled under subdivision a.
3. a. Members of the legislative assembly who receive reimbursement for lodging are also
entitled to reimbursement for travel for not to exceed one round trip taken during any
calendar week, or portion of a week, the legislative assembly is in session, between their
residences and the place of meeting of the legislative assembly, at the rate provided for
state employees with the additional limitation that reimbursement for travel by common
carrier may be only at the cost of coach fare and may not exceed one and one-half times
the amount the member would be entitled to receive as mileage reimbursement for travel
by motor vehicle.
b. A member of the legislative assembly who does not receive reimbursement for lodging
and whose place of residence in the legislative district that the member represents is not
within the city of Bismarck is entitled to reimbursement at the rate provided for state
employees for necessary travel for not to exceed one round trip taken per day between
the residence and the place of meeting of the legislative assembly when it is in session
and may receive reimbursement for lodging at the place of meeting of the legislative
assembly as provided in section 44-08-04 for each calendar day for which round trip
travel reimbursement is not claimed, provided that the total reimbursement may not
exceed the maximum monthly reimbursement allowed under subdivision a of
subsection 2.
4. The amount to which each legislator is entitled must be paid following the organizational
session in December and each month upon submission of a voucher and appropriate
documentation during a regular or special session, consistent with section 26 of article XI of
the constitution of North Dakota.
5. If during a special session, the legislative assembly adjourns for more than three days, a
member of the legislative assembly is entitled to receive compensation during those days only
while in attendance at a standing committee if the legislator is a member of that committee, a
majority or minority leader, or a legislator who is not on that committee but who has the
approval of a majority or minority leader to attend.
6. A day, or portion of a day, spent in traveling to or returning from an organizational, special, or
regular session or a legislative committee meeting must be included as a calendar day during
a legislative session or as a day of a legislative committee meeting for the purposes of this
section.
7. a. In addition, each member is entitled to receive during the term for which the member was
elected, as compensation for the execution of public duties during the biennium, the sum

S. B. NO. 2001 - PAGE 5
of five hundred sixty-ninesix hundred ten dollars through June 30, 20242026, and five
hundred ninety-two six hundred twenty - eigh t dollars thereafter per month, paid monthly.
b. If a member dies or resigns from office during the member's term, the member may be
paid only the allowances provided for in this section for the period for which the member
was actually a member.
c. The majority and minority leaders of the house and senate and the chairman of the
legislative management, if the chairman is not a majority or minority leader, are each
entitled to receive as compensation, in addition to any other compensation or expense
reimbursement provided by law, the sum of four hundred eight four hundred thirty - seven
dollars through June 30, 20242026, and four hundred twenty-fourfour hundred fifty
dollars thereafter per month during the biennium for their execution of public duties.
8. Attendance at any organizational, special, or regular session of the legislative assembly by
any member is a conclusive presumption of entitlement as set out in this section and
compensation and expense allowances must be excluded from gross income for income tax
purposes to the extent permitted for federal income tax purposes under section 127 of the
Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981 [Pub. L. 97-34; 95 Stat. 202; 26 U.S.C. 162(i)].
9. Before each regular legislative session, the legislative management shall make
recommendations and submit any necessary legislation to adjust legislative compensation
amounts.
SECTION 9. AMENDMENT. Section 54-35-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-35-10. Compensation of members and leadership.
1. The members of the legislative management and the members of any committee of the
legislative management are entitled to be compensated for the time spent in attendance at
sessions of the legislative management and of its committees at the rate of two hundred
fivetwo hundred nineteen dollars through June 30, 20242026, and two hundred thirteentwo
hundred twenty - six dollars thereafter per day and must also be paid for expenses incurred in
attending said meetings and in the performance of their official duties in the amounts provided
by law for other state officers.
2. In addition to the compensation provided in subsection 1, the chairman of the legislative
management is entitled to receive an additional fiveten dollars for each day spent in
attendance at sessions of the legislative management and of its committees, and the
chairman of each of the legislative management's committees is entitled to receive fiveten
dollars for each day spent in attendance at sessions of the legislative management or of the
committee which the person chairs.
SECTION 10. LEGISLATIVE INTENT - LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT - CHAMBER
ACCESSIBILITY. It is the intent of the sixty-ninth legislative assembly that the legislative management
review the accessibility of the legislative chambers and gather information regarding options to improve
access.

S. B. NO. 2001 - PAGE 6
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2001.
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 2 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 62 Nays 29 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State